Maine, session 132, LD1975.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1541-B, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 468, §1, is
amended to read:
A. "Advanced communications technology infrastructure" has the same meaning as in
Title 35‑A, section 9202 9402, subsection 1.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§33-F, as amended by PL 2019, c. 625, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §12021, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 625, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 10 MRSA §9902, sub-§3, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 622, §1, is
amended to read:
A. Property and equipment, including related support facilities that provide service to
more than one customer or person, owned or used by a public utility as defined in Title
35‑A, section 102, subsection 13 or by a communications service provider as defined
in Title 35‑A, section 9202, subsection 4. For purposes of this paragraph,
"communications service provider" means an entity offering wireline voice, satellite,
data, fixed wireless data or video retail service to customers in the State.
"Infrastructure" includes, without limitation, real and personal property such as
buildings, offices, power lines, poles, pipes, structures and equipment; and
Sec. 5. 14 MRSA §6000, sub-§3-A, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 594, §5 and
affected by §13, is amended to read:
C. Services provided by a communications service as defined in Title 35‑A, section
9202, subsection 3 wireline voice, satellite, data, fixed wireless data or video retail
service; and
Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (10) to read:
(10) Costs associated with broadband and fiber optics expansion projects,
including preparation, planning, engineering and other related costs in addition to
the construction costs of those projects. If an area within a municipality or
plantation is unserved with respect to broadband service, as defined by the
ConnectMaine Authority as provided in Title 35‑A, section 9204‑A, subsection 1,
broadband and fiber optics expansion projects may serve residential or other
nonbusiness or noncommercial areas in addition to business or commercial areas
within the municipality or plantation;
Sec. 7. 30-A MRSA §5403, sub-§15, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 108, §5, is amended
to read:
15. Communications services systems; community broadband systems. Construct,
maintain and operate a municipal or multimunicipal system composed of infrastructure
capable of being utilized by communications service providers for the provision of
communications services. For the purposes of this subsection, "communications service"
has the same meaning as in Title 35‑A, section 9202, subsection 3 and "communications
service provider" has the same meaning as in Title 35‑A, section 9202, subsection 4 means
Page 1 - 132LR1304(01)

413 any wireline voice, satellite, data, fixed wireless data or video retail service. For the
424 purposes of this subsection, "communications services provider" means an entity offering
435 communications service to customers in the State.
Nothing in this chapter restricts a municipality from purchasing, leasing, constructing or
equipping facilities that are designed to provide communications services. Nothing in this
chapter restricts a municipality from using community broadband systems for internal
municipal government purposes or, by written contract, leasing, selling capacity in or
granting other similar rights to communications service providers to use the facilities in
connection with the provider's offering communications services.
Sec. 8. 35-A MRSA §711, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2017, c. 199, §1, is further
amended to read:
4. Rules. The commission shall adopt rules governing the resolution of pole
attachment disputes and the rates, terms and conditions of joint use. The rules must promote
competition, further the state broadband policy set forth in section 9202‑A and ensure safe,
nondiscriminatory access on just and reasonable terms. The rules must also include a
process for ensuring that a new joint use entity seeking access to the poles, ducts, conduits
or rights-of-way of another joint use entity meets the requirements of subsection 1,
paragraph D. In establishing rates, the commission shall consider various formulas,
including, but not limited to, the formula adopted by the Federal Communications
Commission as codified in 47 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 1, Subpart J, as amended.
Rules adopted or amended pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 9. 35-A MRSA §2503, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2019, c. 625, §4, is further
amended to read:
2. Notice. The applicant may give public notice of the application by publishing its
description of the proposed facility once in a newspaper circulated in the municipality or
municipalities encompassing the limits of the proposed location. The applicant shall send
a copy of any application filed with the Department of Transportation to the municipal
clerk of each municipality in which the facilities are located, or to the clerk of the county
commissioners in the case of facilities within an unorganized township, except that the
applicant may, without publication of its application, place its facility described in its
application on receipt of a permit from the licensing authority as may be otherwise
provided. If a proposed facility is located underground and is in excess of 500 feet in
length, the applicant shall, within 5 business days of submitting an application to the
applicable licensing authority, provide the ConnectMaine Authority established in Title 5,
section 12004‑G, subsection 33‑F a notice that includes a description and the location of
the proposed facility.
Sec. 10. 35-A MRSA §2524, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 127, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 11. 35-A MRSA §2524, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 127, §1, is
amended to read:
A. For a governmental purpose consistent with the police power of the municipality;
or.
Page 2 - 132LR1304(01)

Sec. 12. 35-A MRSA §2524, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 127, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 13. 35-A MRSA §7104-B, sub-§5, ¶I, as amended by PL 2019, c. 625, §5,
is further amended to read:
I. To provide, within existing resources, support for qualified libraries in rural areas of
the State with greatest need, as determined in consultation with the State Librarian, and
the Commissioner of Education and the ConnectMaine Authority, to offer portable
wireless access points, or hotspots, for mobile Internet access.
Sec. 14. 35-A MRSA c. 93, as amended, is repealed.